Arkansas, session 2025, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-23-203 is amended to read as follows:
15-23-203. Director.
The Arkansas Waterways Commission may employ a Director of the Arkansas
Waterways Commission as authorized by law and fix the salary of the director
within the limitations of funds appropriated therefor to assist the
commission in the performance of its duties under this subchapter.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas Waterways Commission shall be
appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor and upon confirmation
by the Senate.
(b) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of
Commerce.

/s/Gilmore



*CRH172*
02-26-2025 13:58:41 CRH172